tests/abbreviations.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Noun ТР":
    ТР<np><top><nom> : ТР
    ТР<np><top><attr> : ТР
    ТР<np><top><gen> : ТР-ниң
    ТР<np><top><dat> : ТР-ге
    ТР<np><top><loc> : ТР-де
    ТР<np><top><abl> : ТР-ден

 "Noun КТПК":
    КТРК<np><top><gen> : КТРК-ның
